District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-101.58

Effect of certificate of amendment.

Repealed.

History

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 203, ch. 269, § 58
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-101.58.
1981 Ed., § 29-358.
1973 Ed., § 29-923b.